Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Chapter 12 Career and Technical Education

Cross references. —

As to cooperation of school districts and community college districts in providing special education, see §§

21-20-101

through

21-20-111

.

As to vocational rehabilitation, see §§

9-2-109

through

9-2-115

.

Authority not delegable by state board of education. —

The state board of education could not delegate to the state director of vocational education the authority to determine whether the board should continue the program of war production training. State ex rel. R. R. Crow & Co. v. Copenhaver, 64 Wyo. 1, 184 P.2d 594,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1947).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Education Code of 1969,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

78 C.J.S. Schools and School districts § 66; 79 C.J.S. Schools and School Districts § 557 et seq.

§ 21-12-101.
“State board” defined; boards of trustees authorized to establish and maintain adult education program.

As used in this chapter “state board” means the state board of education acting as the state board of career and technical education.

The board of trustees of any unified school district in the state may establish and maintain a program of adult education in connection with the public schools of the district. The program shall be open to adults. No community college shall be established except under W.S.

21-18-101

through

21-18-317

.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 82, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 67-1208; W.S. 1957, § 21-313; Laws 1961, ch. 171, § 1; 1969, ch. 111, § 198; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-198; Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2021 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “chapter” for “article.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "career and technical" for "vocational" in (a).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

College and junior college instruction under former provisions. —

See State ex rel. Fremont County Vocational High School Dist. v. Community College Comm'n, 393 P.2d 803,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 21-12-102.
Powers of boards of trustees establishing and maintaining programs.

The board of trustees of any school district within the state establishing and maintaining an adult education program under this chapter, in addition to all other powers provided by law, may:

Fix fee and tuition rates for adult education courses;

Cooperate with the state department of education, the state board, community college commission and the federal government in administering the program; and

Do all things necessary to promote the purposes of this article.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 82, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 67-1210; W.S. 1957, § 21-315; Laws 1961, ch. 171, § 3; 1969, ch. 111, § 199; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-199; Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501; 2000, ch. 73, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Reimbursements intended for school districts, not private companies. —

The 1945 legislature by inserting an item designated as “reimbursements” in the state budget for the use of the division of vocational education did not intend by the use of the word “reimbursements” to provide reimbursement to a lumber company who advanced wages of instructors hired to teach the lumber business to war prisoners based on an alleged agreement by the state board of education to reimburse it from state funds. The word “reimbursements” was intended by the legislature to refer to repayment of funds advanced by school districts and other state and municipal training course authorities in vocational education. State ex rel. R. R. Crow & Co. v. Copenhaver, 64 Wyo. 1, 184 P.2d 594,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1947).

§ 21-12-103.
Special school tax; submission to electors authorized; tax in addition to limitations in W.S. 21-13-102.

For the purpose of maintaining a program of adult education, the board of trustees may submit for vote to the electors of the district, a special school tax of not to exceed two and one-half (2 1/2) mills on the taxable valuation of the district. Said special school tax, if approved, shall be above and in addition to the tax limitations expressed in W.S.

21-13-102

.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 82, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 67-1209; Laws 1953, ch. 14, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-314; Laws 1961, ch. 171, § 2; 1969, ch. 111, § 200; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-200; Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501.

§ 21-12-104.
Special school tax; election; conduct; levy, collection and disbursement.

The election shall be conducted under the law governing school elections and on an election date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

. The ballot shall state the proposition to be voted upon, the amount of the proposed special levy and shall contain a form for voting substantially as follows: “Shall an additional special tax of not to exceed . . . . . mills be levied for the purpose of maintaining a program of adult education?”

Special levy — YES •

Special levy — NO •

If the majority of the votes cast in the election are “special levy — YES”, the tax shall be levied, collected and disbursed in the same manner as other school district taxes.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 201; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-201; Laws 1996, ch. 97, § 2; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501.

Cross references. —

As to levy, collection and distribution of school taxes, see chapter 13 of this title.

As to school elections generally, see §§

22-22-101

to

22-22-304

.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see IV Wyo. L.J. 227.

§ 21-12-105.
Career and technical education demonstration project grants; application; criteria; limitations.

A school district may apply to the state department of education for state assistance to fund expenses associated with the planning, development and implementation of a career and technical education demonstration project as a new or an expansion to any existing high school career and technical education program in the district. As used in this section, “career and technical education program” shall be as specified in W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(D)(II). Amounts awarded under this section shall be used to fund curricular development and project design costs, employ certified teachers to provide course instruction during the two (2) years of project implementation and to fund initial purchases of equipment and supplies, all incurred for demonstration projects which:

Prepare high school students for a full range of post secondary options, including two (2) year and four (4) year college, apprenticeship, military and formal employment training;

Connect academic and technical curriculum grounded in academic and industry standards;

Provide innovative strategies for ensuring student access to career choices, as well as opportunities for work-based learning and dual enrollment in related post secondary education courses;

Support workforce, education and economic needs of Wyoming.

Any amount awarded to a district under this section shall be in addition to and not be considered in determining the school foundation program amount under the education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S.

21-13-309

. A grant awarded under this section shall be for a period of two (2) years and shall not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) for the first year of demonstration project planning, and not more than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) for project implementation in year two (2) of the project grant. Thereafter, state assistance for the project shall be limited to funds distributed to the district within its foundation program amount as determined under the education resource block grant model.

Application for a grant under this section shall be on a form and in a manner specified by rule and regulation of the department, shall be filed with the department on or before June 30 to secure a grant during the immediately succeeding school year, and shall at minimum include:

A proposal based upon an existing partnership between the applicant district, the Wyoming post secondary education institution and industry, which clearly documents the need for establishing the proposed career-technical education demonstration project;

Documentation of integration of industry standards, school redesign and curriculum alignment between high school and post secondary education within the proposed project;

The purposes, plan and timeline for expenditure of grant amounts;

Assurance that school facilities appropriately accommodate the proposed demonstration project; and

Other necessary information required by the state department.

Not later than August 15 of the applicable school year and following review of applications submitted under this section, the department shall notify applicant districts of its decision and shall provide each applicant district a written statement of reasons for approving or denying the application. If the application is approved, the department shall award the grant from amounts made available by legislative appropriation within the school foundation program account for purposes of this section.

Each recipient district shall report to the department on the expenditure of amounts awarded under this section, shall in consultation with representatives of partnership post secondary education programs and industry, provide the department an evaluation of project results and shall provide other information as required by rule and regulation of the department to implement this section.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section and shall work with Wyoming post secondary education institutions and industry in establishing prerequisite school district and post secondary education and industry agreement requirements.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 164, § 1; 2006, ch. 37, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 95, § 201; 2021 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a), substituted “specified in W.S.

21-13-309

(m)(v)(D)(II)” for “defined by W.S.

21-13-329

(a)(i)” and “school foundation program amount under the education resource block grant model pursuant to W.S.

21-13-309

” for “vocational education adjustment to the education resource block grant model under W.S.

21-13-329

”; and repealed former (f), which read: “The grant program established under this section shall terminate June 30, 2008.”

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, in (a), rewrote the first three sentences, added (i) through (iv); in (b), designated the former last two sentences of (a) to be (b), rewrote the former sentences, redesignated former (b) through (d) to be present (c) through (e); rewrote (c); deleted the former second sentence in (d); added “shall in consultation with representatives of partnership post secondary education programs and industry, provide the department an evaluation of project results” in (e); redesignated former (e) to be (g); and added “and shall work with Wyoming post secondary education institutions and industry in establishing prerequisite school district and post secondary education and industry agreement requirements” in (g).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "Career and technical" for "Career-technical" in the section heading; in (a), substituted "career and technical" for "career-technical" preceding "education demonstration" in the first sentence and "career and technical" for "career-vocational" preceding "education program" in the first and second sentences.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2008, ch. 95, § 202, provides:

“(a) Eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the department of education that shall be expended only as necessary to augment amounts within the department's budget for career-technical education demonstration project grants authorized under W.S.

21-12-105

, as amended by Section 201 of this act. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning July 1, 2008, and ending June 30, 2010.

“(b) The department of education is authorized one (1) additional full-time position to administer the career-technical education demonstration project grant program authorized under W.S.

21-12-105

as amended by Section 201 of this act, to coordinate and staff the career-technical education steering committee established under subsection (c) of this section, to implement the department's career-technical education strategic plan developed in accordance with subsection (d) of this section and to coordinate department staff dedicated to strengthening core career-technical education programs. For purposes of this subsection, one hundred seventy-six thousand three hundred seventy-four dollars ($176,374.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the department of education for the period commencing with the effective date of this subsection and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall be expended for the costs of this additional position only.

“(c) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the department of education to fund costs for creating and convening a career-technical education steering committee to assist the department in developing parameters comprising the career-technical education demonstration project grant program authorized under W.S.

21-12-105

as amended by Section 201 of this act, in developing and guiding the evolving statewide career-technical education program and in designing and implementing the statewide strategic plan for Wyoming career-technical education. Steering committee membership shall be appointed by the state superintendent from among members of the Wyoming legislature as forwarded by the president of the Wyoming senate and the speaker of the Wyoming house of representatives, and the state board of education, together with representatives of Wyoming post secondary education institutions, secondary schools, state agencies involved with workforce training, business and industry and other related stakeholders identified by the department. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning on the effective date of this subsection and ending June 30, 2010, and shall be expended only for necessary expenses incurred for the statewide steering committee established under this subsection. Steering committee members shall be reimbursed only for per diem and travel expenses incurred while attending official committee business, at rates prescribed by law for members of the Wyoming legislature. In addition, the department shall transfer funds to the legislative service office for payment of per diem and expenses incurred by legislator steering committee members. The steering committee shall terminate on June 30, 2010, unless extended by the state superintendent and funded by appropriation of the legislature.

“(d) Five hundred sixty thousand dollars ($560,000.00) is appropriated from the public school foundation program account to the department of education for Wyoming career-technical education development, including coordination of statewide career-technical education activities, implementation of steering committee recommendations, development of core career-technical education programs and curriculum, development of a comprehensive statewide model for career-technical education based upon demonstration projects awarded grants under W.S.

21-12-105

as amended by Section 201 of this act, provision of technical assistance to Wyoming school districts pertaining to curriculum planning and development, strengthening of professional development and teacher preparation programs and the evaluation of improvements to career and technical education instruction and delivery. This appropriation is for the period beginning July 1, 2008, and ending June 30, 2010, and shall be expended for purposes specified in this subsection and may be used for contractual services as necessary to obtain required analytical expertise in carrying out duties imposed under this subsection.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, ch. 95, § 203, provides: “On or before December 1, 2009, the department shall report to the joint education interim committee on career-technical education demonstration project grants awarded under W.S.

21-12-105

as amended by Section 201 of this act, the impact of the grant program, steering committee activities and the statewide career-technical education strategic plan on improvements to career-technical education delivery in Wyoming, the related impact of these programs on the career-vocational education component contained within the education resource block grant school funding model, together with recommendations for continuing development and implementation of career-technical education in Wyoming.”